zh-CN: 实用/维护任务类型: 防病毒软件; 数据备份; 数据恢复; 碎片整理; 磁盘清理; 磁盘分区; 驱动程序更新程序; 文件压缩; 注册表清理程序; 系统优化程序; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta zadatka pomoćne usluge / održavanja: Antivirus; Sigurnosna kopija podataka; Oporavak podataka; Defragmentacija; Čišćenje diska; Particioniranje diska; Program za ažuriranje upravljačkih programa; Kompresija datoteke; Program za čišćenje registra; Program za optimizaciju sustava; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип задача за помощна програма/поддръжка: Антивирус; Архивиране на данни; Възстановяване на данни; Дефрагментиране; Почистване на диск; Разделяне на диск; Актуализатор на драйвери; Компресиране на файлове; Почиствана на регистъра; Системен оптимизатор; Други
nl: Type nuts-/onderhoudstaak: Antivirus; Gegevensback-up; Gegevens herstellen; Defragmentatie; Schijfopruiming; Schijfpartitionering; Updater voor stuurprogramma's; Bestandscompressie; Registeropruimer; Systeemoptimalisator; Andere
en: Utility/Maintenance task type: Antivirus; Data backup; Data recovery; Defragmentation; Disk cleanup; Disk partitioning; Driver updater; File compression; Registry cleaner; System optimizer; Other
cs: Typ úkolu údržby: Antivirový program; Zálohování dat; Obnova dat; Defragmentace; Vyčištění disku; Rozdělení disku; Aktualizátor ovladačů; Komprese souborů; Čistič registru; Optimalizátor systému; Jiné
de: Aufgabentyp des Dienstprogramms/der Wartung: Antivirus; Datensicherung; Datenwiederherstellung; Defragmentation; Datenträgerbereinigung; Datenträgerpartitionierung; Treiber-Updater; Dateikomprimierung; Registry-Reiniger; Systemoptimierer; Sonstiges
fr: Type de tâche utilitaire/maintenance: Antivirus; Sauvegarde de données; Récupération de données; Défragmentation; Nettoyage de disque; Partitionnement de disque; Programme de mise à jour du pilote; Compression de fichiers; Nettoyeur de registre; Optimiseur de système; Autre
ru: Тип задачи обслуживания: Антивирус; Резервное копирование данных; Восстановление данных; Дефрагментация; Очистка диска; Разбиение диска на разделы; Обновление драйверов; Сжатие файлов; Очиститель реестра; Оптимизация системы; Другое
nb: Oppgavetype for verktøy/vedlikehold: Antivirus; Sikkerhetskopiering av data; Datagjenoppretting; Defragmentering; Diskopprydding; Diskpartisjonering; Driveroppdatering; Filkompresjon; Registerrenser; Systemoptimalisering; Annen
sk-SK: Typ úžitkovej/údržbovej úlohy: Antivírus; Zálohovanie dát; Obnova dát; Defragmentácia; Čistenie disku; Rozdelenie disku; Aktualizátor ovládačov; Kompresia súborov; Čistič registra; Optimalizátor systému; Iné
hu: Segédprogram/karbantartási feladat típusa: Vírusirtó; Adatmentés; Adat-helyreállítás; Töredezettségmentesítés; Lemeztisztítás; Lemezparticionálás; Illesztőprogram frissítő; Fájltömörítés; Bejegyzéstisztító; Rendszeroptimalizáló; Egyéb
ko: 유틸리티/유지보수 작업 유형: 바이러스 백신; 데이터 백업; 데이터 복구; 조각 모음; 디스크 정리; 디스크 파티셔닝; 드라이버 업데이트 프로그램; 파일 압축; 레지스트리 클리너; 시스템 최적화 프로그램; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de tarefa de serviço/manutenção: Antivírus; Cópia de segurança de dados; Recuperação de dados; Desfragmentação; Limpeza de disco; Particionamento de disco; Atualizador de driver; Compressão de ficheiros; Limpeza de registo; Otimizador do sistema; Outro
fi: Apuohjelma-/ylläpitotehtävätyyppi: Virustorjuntaohjelmisto; Datan varmuuskopiointi; Datan palautus; Eheytys; Levyn puhdistus; Levyn osiointi; Ajurin päivitysohjelma; Tiedoston pakkaus; Rekisterin puhdistusohjelma; Järjestelmän optimoija; Muu
zh-TW: 效用/維護任務類型: 防毒軟體; 資料備份; 資料恢復; 磁碟重組; 磁碟清理; 磁碟分割; 驅動程式更新程式; 檔案壓縮; 登錄檔清理器; 系統優化軟體; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta naloge za uporabnost/vzdrževanje: Antivirus; Varnostno kopiranje podatkov; Obnovitev podatkov; Defragmentacija; Čiščenje diska; Particioniranje diska; Posodabljanje gonilnikov; Stiskanje datotek; Čistilec registra; Sistemski optimizator; Drugo
pl: Typ zadania użyteczności/konserwacji: Antywirus; Kopia zapasowych danych; Odzyskiwanie danych; Defragmentacja; Czyszczenie dysku; Partycjonowanie dysku; Aktualizator sterowników; Kompresja pliku; Oczyszczacz rejestru; Optymalizator systemu; Pozostałe
th: ประเภทงานยูทิลิตี้/บำรุงรักษา: ป้องกันไวรัส; สำรองข้อมูล; กู้คืนข้อมูล; จัดเรียงข้อมูล; ล้างข้อมูลบนดิสก์; แบ่งพาร์ติชันดิสก์; โปรแกรมอัพเดตไดรเวอร์; การบีบอัดไฟล์; ซอฟต์แวร์ทำความสะอาดรีจิสทรี; เครื่องมือเพิ่มประสิทธิภาพระบบ; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di attività di utenza/manutenzione: Antivirus; Backup dei dati; Recupero dei dati; Deframmentazione; Pulizia del disco; Partizionamento del disco; Aggiornamento del driver; Compressione del file; Pulitore del registro; Ottimizzatore di sistema; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de tarefa de utilidade/manutenção: Antivírus; Backup de dados; Recuperação de dados; Desfragmentação; Limpeza de disco; Particionamento de disco; Atualizador de driver; Compressão de arquivo; Limpador de registro; Otimizador de sistema; Outro
tr: Yardımcı Program/Bakım görev türü: Antivirüs; Veri yedekleme; Veri kurtarma; Birleştirme; Disk temizleme; Disk bölümleme; Sürücü güncelleyici program; Dosya sıkıştırma; Kayıt defteri temizleyici program; Sistem optimizasyon aracı; Diğer
sv: Uppgiftstyp för verktyg/underhåll: Antivirus; Säkerhetskopiering av data; Dataåterställning; Defragmentering; Diskrensning; Diskpartitionering; Drivrutinsuppdateringsverktyg; Filkomprimering; Registerrensare; Systemoptimerare; Annat
da: Hjælpe-/vedligeholdelsesopgavetype: Antivirus; Sikkerhedskopiering af data; Datagendannelse; Defragmentering; Diskoprydning; Diskpartitionering; Driveropdatering; Filkomprimering; Mapperenser; Systemoptimering; Andet
lt-LT: Paslaugos / priežiūros darbų tipas: Antivirusinė; Duomenų atsarginė kopija; Duomenų atkūrimas; Defragmentavimas; Disko valymas; Disko skaidymas; Tvarkyklės atnaujinimas; Failo suglaudinimas; Registro valymo įrankis; Sistemos optimizatorius; Kita
es: Tipo de tarea de utilidad/mantenimiento: Antivirus; Copia de seguridad de datos; Recuperación de datos; Desfragmentación; Limpieza de disco; Partición de disco; Actualizador de controladores; Compresión de archivos; Limpiador de registro; Optimizador del sistema; Otros
ro-RO: Tip de sarcină utilitară/întreținere: Antivirus; Backup date; Recuperarea datelor; Defragmentare; Curățarea discului; Partiționarea discului; Actualizator drivere; Comprimarea fișierelor; Instrument de curățare registru; Instrument de optimizare sistem; Altele
ja: ユーティリティ/メンテナンスタスクの種類: ウイルス対策; データバックアップ; データ復元; デフラグ; ディスククリーンアップ; ディスクパーティション; ドライバーアップデーター; ファイル圧縮; レジストリクリーナー; システムオプティマイザー; その他
vi: Loại công tác Tiện ích/Bảo trì: Chống virus; Sao lưu dữ liệu; Khôi phục dữ liệu; Công cụ chống phân mảnh; Công cụ dọn dẹp ổ cứng; Công cụ phân vùng ổ đĩa; Trình cập nhật trình điều khiển; Nén tập tin; Trình dọn dẹp Registry; Trình tối ưu hóa hệ thống; Khác
el: Τύπος εργασίας utility/maintenance: Antivirus; Δημιουργία αντιγράφων ασφαλείας δεδομένων; Ανάκτηση δεδομένων; Ανασυγκρότηση; Εκκαθάριση δίσκου; Διαμέριση δίσκου; Ενημέρωση προγράμματος οδήγησης; Συμπίεση αρχείων; Καθαριστικό μητρώου; Βελτιστοποιητής συστήματος; Άλλο